Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-1210
Failure to notify the sheriff of the sale of tranquilizer guns; penalty; record.

(1) Any person, partnership, limited liability company, or corporation selling any gun or other device as described in section 28-1209 which fails to immediately notify the sheriff of the county of the sale and giving the name and address of the purchaser thereof and the make and number of the gun or device commits the offense of failure to notify the sheriff of the sale of tranquilizer guns.

(2) The sheriff shall keep a record of such sale with the information furnished pursuant to this section.

(3) Failure to notify the sheriff of the sale of tranquilizer guns is a Class III misdemeanor.

Laws 1977, LB 38, § 242;

Laws 1993, LB 121, § 179.